Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2357. A. The withheld taxes and estimated taxes paid


shall be allowed as credits as provided by law.


B. 1. There shall be allowed as a credit against the tax


imposed by Section 2355 of this title the amount of tax paid another


state by a resident individual, as defined in paragraph 4 of Section


2353 of this title, upon income received as compensation for


personal services in such other state; provided, such credit shall


not be allowed with respect to any income specified in Section 114


of Title 4 of the United States Code, 4 U.S.C., Section 114, upon

Req. No. 2685 Page 1


which a state is prohibited from imposing an income tax. The credit


shall not exceed such proportion of the tax payable under Section


2355 of this title as the compensation for personal services subject


to tax in the other state and also taxable under Section 2355 of


this title bears to the Oklahoma adjusted gross income as defined in


paragraph 13 of Section 2353 of this title.


2. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2007, there shall


be allowed to a resident individual or part-year resident individual


or nonresident individual member of the Armed Forces as a credit


against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title twenty percent


(20%) of the credit for child care expenses allowed under the


Internal Revenue Code of the United States 1986, as amended, or five


percent (5%) of the child tax credit allowed under the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, whichever amount is greater.


Neither credit authorized by this paragraph shall exceed the tax


imposed by Section 2355 of this title. The maximum child care


credit allowable on the Oklahoma income tax return shall be prorated


on the ratio that Oklahoma adjusted gross income bears to the


federal adjusted gross income. The credit authorized by this


paragraph shall not be claimed by any taxpayer if the federal


adjusted gross income reflected on the Oklahoma return for the


taxpayer is in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).


C. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, a taxpayer may


claim the child tax credit allowed pursuant to paragraph 2 of

Req. No. 2685 Page 2


subsection B of this section for each birth that a certificate of


birth resulting in stillbirth has been issued pursuant to Section 1-


318.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, if the child otherwise


would have been a member of the household of the taxpayer. The


taxpayer may claim the credit only in the tax year in which the


stillbirth occurred. The credit authorized pursuant to this


subsection shall be five percent (5%) of the child tax credit that


would be allowed under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, if the child would have been a dependent and if the child


would have been a member of the household. The Oklahoma Tax


Commission may promulgate rules to enforce the provisions of this


subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2685 QD 12/31/2025 12:00:21 PM



















Req. No. 2685 Page 3